Vermont, session 2025-2026, H702.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as the “Vermont Squatter Reform Act.”
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 3705 is amended to read:
§ 3705. UNLAWFUL TRESPASS
(a)(1) A person shall be imprisoned for not more than three months or fined
not more than $500.00, or both, if, without legal authority or the consent of the
person in lawful possession, the person enters or remains on any land or in any
place as to which notice against trespass is given by:
(A) actual communication by the person in lawful possession or the
person’s agent or by a law enforcement officer acting on behalf of such person
or the person’s agent;
(B) signs or placards so designed and situated as to give reasonable
notice; or
(C) in the case of abandoned property:
(i) signs or placards, posted by the owner, the owner’s agent, or a
law enforcement officer, and so designed and situated as to give reasonable
notice; or
(ii) actual communication by a law enforcement officer.
* * *
VT LEG #385048 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.702
2026 Page 3 of 6
(d) A person who enters a building other than a residence, whose access is
normally locked, whether or not the access is actually locked, or a residence in
violation of an order of any court of competent jurisdiction in this State shall
be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $500.00, or
both.
(e) A person who enters a dwelling house, whether or not a person is
actually present, knowing that the person is not licensed or privileged to do so
shall be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than
$2,000.00, or both.
* * *
(g)(1) A person who enters the land or premises of another and resides on
the land or premises for any period of time, knowing that the person is not
licensed or privileged to do so, shall be imprisoned for not more than three
years or fined not more than $2,000.00, or both.
(2) A person who violates subdivision (1) of this subsection and causes
greater than $1,000.00 in damages to the land or premises shall be imprisoned
for not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(3) As used in this subsection, “resides” means to inhabit or live on or
within the land or premises.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 2033 is added to read:
§ 2033. FRAUDULENT LEASES
VT LEG #385048 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.702
2026 Page 4 of 6
A person who, with the intent to enter or reside on the land or premises of
another for any period of time, knowingly presents or causes to be presented a
document purporting to be a valid lease agreement for the land or premises that
contains false representations as to any material fact or that conceals a material
fact shall be imprisoned for not more than three years or fined not more than
$2,000.00, or both.
Sec. 4. 12 V.S.A. § 4853b is amended to read:
§ 4853b. UNLAWFUL OCCUPANT; EXPEDITED HEARING
(a)(1) In an action for ejectment, the landlord, the landlord’s agent, or the
tenant may file a motion for a judgment that the plaintiff is entitled to
immediate possession of the premises on the grounds that:
(A) the defendant is a person that is occupying a dwelling unit
without right or permission and the written rental agreement for the dwelling
unit prohibits subleasing pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 4456b(a)(2); or
(B) the defendant, knowing that there was no license or privilege to
do so, entered and is residing on the land or premises of another person.
(2) The motion may be filed and served with the complaint or at any
time after the complaint has been filed. The motion shall be accompanied by
an affidavit setting forth particular facts in support of the motion and a copy of
the lease agreement.
VT LEG #385048 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.702
2026 Page 5 of 6
(b) A hearing on the motion shall be held any time after 10 days’ notice to
the parties.
(c) At any time before the hearing, the defendant may oppose the motion
pursuant to Rule (7)(b)(6) of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure by filing an
affidavit, a signed written statement, or a memorandum in opposition to the
motion. The affidavit, signed written statement, or memorandum shall set
forth particular facts to show that a genuine dispute of fact exists in relation to
the motion.
(d)(1) If the defendant fails to appear for the hearing, or to file an affidavit,
signed written statement, or memorandum in opposition to the plaintiff’s
motion, or has failed to file an answer in the time provided pursuant to Rule 12
of the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, the plaintiff shall be entitled to
judgment by default for immediate possession of the premises.
(2) If the court finds that the defendant is a person that is occupying the
dwelling unit without right or permission and the written rental agreement for
the dwelling unit prohibits subleasing pursuant to 9 V.S.A. § 4456b(a)(2), or
that the defendant, knowing that there was no license or privilege to do so,
entered and is residing on the land or premises of another person, the court
shall grant the plaintiff’s motion and issue judgment in favor of the plaintiff for
immediate possession of the premises.
VT LEG #385048 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.702
2026 Page 6 of 6
(e) If the court issues judgment in favor of the plaintiff pursuant to
subsection (d) of this section, the court shall, on the date judgment is entered,
issue a writ of possession directing the sheriff of the county in which the
property or a portion thereof is located to serve the writ upon the defendant
and, not sooner than five days after the writ is served, to put the plaintiff into
possession.
(f) At any time prior to the execution of the writ of possession, the
defendant may file an affidavit, signed written statement, or a motion with the
court setting forth facts demonstrating that the defendant is occupying the
premises lawfully. The court shall treat an affidavit, signed written statement,
or a motion filed under this subsection as a motion pursuant to Rule 59 or 60 of
the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, as appropriate.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385048 v.1